New York, session 2025-2026, S3348.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The commissioner of the department of environmental conser- 2 vation shall, within 180 days of the effective date of this act, promul- 3 gate rules and regulations, which may include the updating of existing 4 regulations, which establish targets for the sales of zero emissions 5 medium and heavy duty vehicles in the state. Such standards shall 6 contain the same sales targets, fleet percentages, and credit calcu- 7 lations for zero emissions medium and heavy duty vehicles as set forth 8 in regulations adopted by the state of California. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07642-01-5